New York, session 2025-2026, S6775.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 190 of the labor law, as amended 2 by chapter 328 of the laws of 1972, is amended and a new subdivision 10 3 is added to read as follows: 4 1. "Wages" means the earnings of an employee for labor or services 5 rendered, regardless of whether the amount of earnings is determined on 6 a time, piece, commission, bonus, or other basis. The term "wages" also 7 includes benefits or wage supplements as defined in section one hundred 8 ninety-eight-c of this article, except for the purposes of sections one 9 hundred ninety-one and one hundred ninety-two of this article. 10 10. "Bonus" constitutes wages as defined in subdivision one of this 11 section, regardless of the source of revenue, when (a) the formula under 12 which a bonus is determined is certain and all the data utilized in 13 calculating the amount of a bonus under the formula is available to the 14 employer or (b) when the amount of a bonus has been declared by the 15 employer. 16 § 2. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 193-a to read as 17 follows: 18 § 193-a. Wages non-forfeitable. All wages covered under this article 19 shall be non-forfeitable once the amount of the wage is known or can 20 with reasonable certainty be known. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02379-01-5